Missouri, session 2026, HB2229.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
D
Section A. Chapter 135, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 135.1685, to read as follows:
135.1685. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri No
H
Tax on Car Loan Interest Tax Credit".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "ATpplicable passenger vehicle", any new vehicle:
(a) The original use of which commences with the taxpayer for personal use;
(b)IWhich is manufactured primarily for use on public streets, roads, and
highways, but shall not include a vehicle operated exclusively on a rail or rails;
W
(c) Which has at least two wheels;
(d) Which is a car, minivan, van, sport utility vehicle, pickup truck, or
motorcycle;
(e) Which is treated as a motor vehicle for purposes of Title II of the Clean Air
Act;
(f) Which has a gross vehicle weight rating of less than fourteen thousand
pounds; and
(g) The final assembly of which occurred within the United States and which was
sold in this state on or after January 1, 2026;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2229 2
(2) "Final assembly", the process by which a manufacturer produces an
applicable passenger vehicle at, or through the use of, a plant, factory, or other place
from which the vehicle is delivered to a dealer with all component parts necessary for
the mechanical operation of the vehicle included with the vehicle, whether the
component parts are permanently installed in or on the vehicle;
N
(3) "Qualified amount", for any qualified taxpayer in a given tax year, the total
amount of the qualified passenger vehicle loan interest paid or accrued during the tax
year, not to exceed ten thousand dollars per qualified Wtaxpayer per tax year;
(4) "Qualified passenger vehicle loan interest", any interest which is paid or
accrued during the tax year on indebtedness incurred by the taxpayer after December
31, 2025, for the purchase of, and that is secured by a first lien on, an applicable
A
passenger vehicle for personal use. The term qualified passenger vehicle loan interest
shall include indebtedness that results from refinancing any indebtedness and that is
secured by a first lien on the applicaRble passenger vehicle with respect to which the
refinanced indebtedness was incurred, but only to the extent the amount of such
resulting indebtedness does not exceed the amount of such refinanced indebtedness.
D
Indebtedness described under this subdivision shall not include any indebtedness owned
to a person who is related to the taxpayer, within the meaning of such term as described
under 26 U.S.C. SecHtion 267(b) or Section 707(b)(1). The term qualified passenger
vehicle loan interest shall not include any amount paid or incurred on a loan to finance
fleet sales, a loan incurred for the purchase of a commercial vehicle that is not used for
T
personal purposes, any lease financing, a loan to finance the purchase of a vehicle with a
salvage title, or a loan to finance the purchase of a vehicle intended to be used for scrap
or parts; I
W(5) "Qualified taxpayer", any individual subject to the state income tax imposed
under chapter 143, excluding the withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191 to
143.265, who purchased a new applicable passenger vehicle and paid or accrued
qualified passenger vehicle loan interest during the tax year for which the tax credit is
claimed;
(6) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise due under chapter 143,
excluding withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265.
3. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, but on or before
December 31, 2029, a qualified taxpayer shall be allowed to claim a tax credit against
the taxpayer's state tax liability in an amount equal to the taxpayer's qualified amount,
subject to the income provisions under subsection 4 of this section.
4. The amount which is otherwise allowable as a tax credit under subsection 3 of
this section as qualified passenger vehicle loan interest, determined without regard to

HB 2229 3
this subsection and after the application of subsection 3 of this section, shall be reduced,
but not below zero, by two hundred dollars for each one thousand dollars, or portion
thereof, by which the Missouri adjusted gross income of the taxpayer, as defined in
section 143.121, for the tax year exceeds one hundred thousand dollars or two hundred
thousand dollars if filing a combined Missouri income tax return.
N
5. Interest shall not be treated as qualified passenger vehicle loan interest under
this section unless the taxpayer includes the vehicle identification number of the
applicable passenger vehicle on the return of tax for thWe tax year.
6. Tax credits issued under the provisions of this section shall not be refundable.
No tax credit claimed under this section shall be carried forward to any subsequent tax
year.
A
7. No tax credit claimed under this section shall be assigned, transferred, sold, or
otherwise conveyed.
8. The department of revenRue shall promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section including, but not limited to, rules
relating to the verification of a taxpayer's qualified amount. Any rule or portion of a
D
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions oHf chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
T
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
9. IUnder section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
W(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
four years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset; and
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a taxpayer from claiming a tax credit
properly issued before this program was sunset in a tax year after the program is sunset.
✔